Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-2935
Obligation; issuance; requirements.

Each obligation shall be issued in conformity with the Infrastructure Development Investment Program Act and federal securities regulations, including continuing disclosure requirements and limitations on arbitrage earnings under 26 U.S.C. 148, as such section existed on January 1, 2026.

Laws 2026, LB1126, § 35.
July 18, 2026